Illinois, session 104th, HB3529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois High-Impact AI Governance Principles and Disclosure 6Act. 7    Section 5. Findings. The widespread usage of AI systems 8has raised several public concerns, including the potential 9for AI systems to perpetuate biases, produce non-transparent 10decisions, and cause unintended consequences. These issues can 11result in significant harm to individuals and communities.  12    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:13    "Artificial intelligence system" or "AI system" means a 14system that can work on its own to some extent, that uses data 15provided by humans or machines to figure out how to achieve 16specific goals set by humans, that does this using methods 17like machine learning or rules based on logic and knowledge, 18and that creates and outputs content, predictions, 19recommendations, or decisions, which can affect the world 20around it.21    "Business" means a person engaged in commercial, 22industrial, or professional activities. "Business" includes a   HB3529- 2 -LRB104 09752 BDA 19818 b1for-profit entity and a non-profit organization. 2    Section 15. Five principles of AI governance. To address 3the concerns detailed in the findings in Section 5 of this Act 4and to ensure that negative impacts of AI system use are 5prevented, the Department of Innovation and Technology shall 6adopt rules as may be necessary to ensure that businesses 7using AI systems are compliant with the 5 principles of AI 8governance as follows:9        (1) Safety: Ensuring systems operate without causing 10harm to individuals. 11        (2) Transparency: Providing clear and understandable 12explanations of how systems work and make decisions. 13        (3) Accountability: Identifying and holding 14individuals or companies responsible for the system's 15performance and outcomes. 16        (4) Fairness: Preventing and mitigating bias to ensure 17equitable treatment for all individuals. 18        (5) Contestability: Allowing individuals to challenge 19and seek redress for decisions made by the system.  20    Section 20. Public disclosure requirement. 21    (a) The Illinois Department of Innovation and Technology 22shall adopt rules to ensure that a business using an AI system 23in Illinois publishes on the business's official Internet 24website accessible to the public a report explaining   HB3529- 3 -LRB104 09752 BDA 19818 b1compliance with the 5 principles of AI governance iterated in 2this Act. This report shall: 3        (1) be updated annually and whenever significant 4    changes are made to the AI system, such as modifications 5    to algorithms, substantial alterations to data inputs, or 6    shifts in operational contexts, additional significant 7    change shall be established by the Department of 8    Innovation and Technology; 9        (2) include information on the design, major decisions 10    made during the design process (such as testing metrics), 11    training data, risk mitigation strategies, and any impact 12    assessments conducted; and13        (3) be written in plain language to ensure 14    accessibility for the general public, while also providing 15    a more detailed explanation for specialized audiences; 16    this 2-level approach ensures clarity for everyone while 17    offering enough depth for those who may need to understand 18    or challenge the system or its outputs, such as in cases of 19    fairness or discrimination. 20    (b) Any business using AI systems shall be subject to a 21civil penalty of $1,000 for violation of this Act or rules 22adopted under this Act unless the business (1) properly 23complies with the provisions of this Act and (2) publicly 24discloses compliance with the provisions of this Act. 25    Section 25. Applicability. This Act applies to all   HB3529- 4 -LRB104 09752 BDA 19818 b1businesses with 10 or more employees. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 31, 2026.